Utah statutes.
8-3-2.   Burial rights -- Certificates.

Every purchaser of a lot or burial right therein shall be furnished by such executive officers or individual owners with a certificate of burial rights, properly executed, and the same may be filed and recorded by the county recorder of the county within which the cemetery is situated.



No Change Since 1953

